lexc/adj/enhuadjmely.lexc
LEXICON Possmmely
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez23§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA22§st§uue2§l  #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor               #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE21§m   Fammely;   ! m
!+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE21fazek§m        Genmely;  ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE21§d   Fammely;   ! d
!+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE21fazek§d        Genmely;  ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE21§   Fammely;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE2§nk   Fammely;    ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE21§t§OEOE25§k   Fammely;   ! etek, atok
!+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE21fazek§t§OEOE25§k Genmely;  ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE21§k   Fammely;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE22§im   Fammely;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE22§id   Fammely;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE22§i   Fammely;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE22§ink   Fammely;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Fammely;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE22§ik   Fammely;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fammely1;


LEXICON Plurmely
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez21§k    Genmely;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez17§k    Genmely;
                            Genmely;
LEXICON Plurmmely
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez21§k    Genmely;
!+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez17§k    Genmely;
                            Genmely1;
        
LEXICON Fammely
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genmely;
                       Genmely;
LEXICON Fammely1
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genmely;
                       Genmely1;

LEXICON Genmely
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Casemely;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casemely;
                       Casemely;
LEXICON Genmely1
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Casemely;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casemely;
                       Casemely1;
 
LEXICON Casemely
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe2§l     #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez24§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA2§l      #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe2§z     #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA2§k       #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue2§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§    #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA2§        #;  ! ba, be
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA2§n       #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l    #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA2§        #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n    #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig

LEXICON Casemely1
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe2§l     #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez24§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA2§l      #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe2§z     #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA2§k       #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue2§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§    #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA2§        #;  ! ba, be
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA2§n       #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l    #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA2§        #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n    #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
                          Ikmely;

!
!mély 
!
Lexicon Ikmely
+Ik:^ik     Possikmely;
+Ik:^ik     Plurikmely;
+Ik:^ik     Famikmely;
            #;

LEXICON Possikmely
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez23§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA22§st§uue2§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE21§m   Famikmely;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE21fazek§m   Famikmely;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE21§d   Famikmely;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE21fazek§d   Famikmely;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE21§   Famikmely;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§AE21§   Famikmely;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE2§nk   Famikmely;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE21§t§OEOE25§k   Famikmely;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE21fazek§t§OEOE25§k   Famikmely;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE21§k   Famikmely;   ! ük, uk
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§UUE21§k   Famikmely;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§AE22§im   Famikmely;   ! aim
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE22§im   Famikmely;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§AE22§id   Famikmely;   ! aid
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE22§id   Famikmely;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§AE22§i   Famikmely;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE22§i   Famikmely;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§AE22§ink   Famikmely;   ! aink, eink
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE22§ink   Famikmely;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Famikmely;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Famikmely;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§AE22§ik   Famikmely;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE22§ik   Famikmely;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famikmely;
LEXICON Plurikmely
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez21§k    Genikmely;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez17§k    Genikmely;
                            Genikmely;

LEXICON Famikmely
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genikmely;
                       Genikmely;

LEXICON Genikmely
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseikmely;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseikmely;
                       Caseikmely;
  
LEXICON Caseikmely
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe2§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez24§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA2§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe2§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA2§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe2§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue2§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe2§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA2§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA2§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA2§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig


LEXICON AddAdja
0:^+cMid§oeoebbmely§bb Tocase1a;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocasea;

Lexicon Tocase1a
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Possmmelya;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Plurmmelya;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Fammelya1;

Lexicon Tocasea
[stem]+Adj:0     Possmelya;
[stem]+Adj:0     Plurmelya;
[stem]+Adj:0     Fammelya;

LEXICON Adjige
asztrológiányi AddAdja;
csatói AddAdja;
farmakológiányi AddAdja;
ginekológiai AddAdja;
hungarológiai AddAdja;
kapcsolórúdi AddAdja;
kutatómunkai AddAdja;
módosítvánnyi AddAdja;
parabolányi AddAdja;
rakétányi AddAdja;
szállítói AddAdja;
terminológiai AddAdja;
vizsgálati AddAdja;
LEXICON Adj
Aral-tavi AddAdja;
abrakostarisznyai AddAdja;
adriáni AddAdja;
agronómiai AddAdja;
akasztóhorgi AddAdja;
akárkicsodányi AddAdja;
alexai AddAdja;
alkáli AddAdja;
alsókálinfalvi AddAdja;
ambubabányi AddAdja;
andalúziai AddAdja;
angyalnyi AddAdja;
antipátiai AddAdja;
apainyi AddAdja;
apátiányi AddAdja;
arhangelszki AddAdja;
asszisztenciai AddAdja;
atkai AddAdja;
aulai AddAdja;
avediki AddAdja;
bacsai AddAdja;
bakonyi AddAdja;
balkáni AddAdja;
bangitányi AddAdja;
baritonistai AddAdja;
bartossághi AddAdja;
baumgarteni AddAdja;
bendai AddAdja;
berthai AddAdja;
bicsérdistai AddAdja;
bioszférai AddAdja;
blandratai AddAdja;
bogdanichi AddAdja;
boldogkőújfalui AddAdja;
bonszainyi AddAdja;
borsmonostori AddAdja;
bottliki AddAdja;
brokkolinyi AddAdja;
budinyi AddAdja;
bunseni AddAdja;
bácsjózseffalvi AddAdja;
bárkányi AddAdja;
béluskai AddAdja;
bögrecsárdányi AddAdja;
bős-nagymarosi AddAdja;
centristányi AddAdja;
cicamacai AddAdja;
cirádányi AddAdja;
constantiai AddAdja;
csanaki AddAdja;
cseljabinszkinyi AddAdja;
csicsógyörgyfalvi AddAdja;
csinálmánnyi AddAdja;
csonti AddAdja;
csájai AddAdja;
csóti AddAdja;
cuminyi AddAdja;
célforgalmi AddAdja;
dalárdistai AddAdja;
deccardi AddAdja;
determinatív AddAdja;
diktatúrai AddAdja;
disznóhizlaldai AddAdja;
dobrai AddAdja;
dombnyi AddAdja;
drapériai AddAdja;
duchoni AddAdja;
dunyhányi AddAdja;
dávodi AddAdja;
díványpárnai AddAdja;
egoni AddAdja;
eisenhoweri AddAdja;
elektroterápiai AddAdja;
emberábrázolási AddAdja;
energiányi AddAdja;
erie-tóinyi AddAdja;
etnikai AddAdja;
exkluzív AddAdja;
fajtaazonossági AddAdja;
fancsalinyi AddAdja;
fazekasbodai AddAdja;
fejvadászi AddAdja;
felsőruhányi AddAdja;
fetányi AddAdja;
filmmúzeumi AddAdja;
fizikaszertári AddAdja;
flóbertpuskai AddAdja;
fogászatinyi AddAdja;
fordítóirodai AddAdja;
fotodiódai AddAdja;
frekvenciai AddAdja;
futballi AddAdja;
fékezőrakétányi AddAdja;
férjeurányi AddAdja;
fúvókányi AddAdja;
főmondati AddAdja;
galacfalvi AddAdja;
garagulyi AddAdja;
gazdinyi AddAdja;
geopolitikai AddAdja;
gigantomániai AddAdja;
gogoli AddAdja;
gorkai AddAdja;
gruberi AddAdja;
guppi AddAdja;
gyepükajáni AddAdja;
gyorbirói AddAdja;
gyászruhányi AddAdja;
győrújfalusi AddAdja;
gépjavítási AddAdja;
gúlányi AddAdja;
hadoványi AddAdja;
hajnyi AddAdja;
hallójárati AddAdja;
hamzai AddAdja;
haplodiploidiányi AddAdja;
harruckerni AddAdja;
határkiigazítási AddAdja;
hegemóniányi AddAdja;
hetérányi AddAdja;
hitvilági AddAdja;
homonimai AddAdja;
hudovernigi AddAdja;
hársi AddAdja;
hóri AddAdja;
iharosi AddAdja;
ingatlanvásárlási AddAdja;
irodai AddAdja;
izosztáziai AddAdja;
jendrassiki AddAdja;
jutai AddAdja;
józsai AddAdja;
kalocsni AddAdja;
kapcsi AddAdja;
karmelitányi AddAdja;
katonaorvosi AddAdja;
keresztfányi AddAdja;
kiruccanási AddAdja;
kislámpányi AddAdja;
klotti AddAdja;
kollektivistányi AddAdja;
konfuciusi AddAdja;
kordi AddAdja;
kovai AddAdja;
króni AddAdja;
kurityáni AddAdja;
kámzsai AddAdja;
kéttornyúlaki AddAdja;
könyvvásárlási AddAdja;
kúriányi AddAdja;
laki AddAdja;
lauringeri AddAdja;
libánfalvi AddAdja;
lombardiai AddAdja;
lábfalvi AddAdja;
lídiai AddAdja;
magbugai AddAdja;
majdaninyi AddAdja;
maniókányi AddAdja;
maróninyi AddAdja;
megatonnányi AddAdja;
mexikói AddAdja;
milliárdocskányi AddAdja;
mohnyi AddAdja;
morénányi AddAdja;
munkaviszonyi AddAdja;
máriapócsi AddAdja;
möbiusi AddAdja;
nagykapornaki AddAdja;
napnyi AddAdja;
neuroplasztikányi AddAdja;
nyalkai AddAdja;
nyuszinyi AddAdja;
németbányai AddAdja;
offenzíványi AddAdja;
ontario-tói AddAdja;
orvoslati AddAdja;
paginányi AddAdja;
papagájnyi AddAdja;
parádsasvári AddAdja;
pedáli AddAdja;
petőházai AddAdja;
pisztricgombai AddAdja;
pohárkai AddAdja;
porschei AddAdja;
pritaminpaprikai AddAdja;
pszichotechnikai AddAdja;
pákai AddAdja;
páti AddAdja;
raabi AddAdja;
ransonneti AddAdja;
rendszertani AddAdja;
rinyaújnépi AddAdja;
rostai AddAdja;
rácországi AddAdja;
rósejbni AddAdja;
sarokrámai AddAdja;
selejtgyártmánnyi AddAdja;
smoncányi AddAdja;
spanyolviaszi AddAdja;
stilisztányi AddAdja;
sypossi AddAdja;
szalamandrai AddAdja;
szecskai AddAdja;
szentjakabi AddAdja;
szijácsfai AddAdja;
szivattyúi AddAdja;
szomorúsági AddAdja;
szunyoghi AddAdja;
százalékszámítási AddAdja;
szókai AddAdja;
sárospataki AddAdja;
tabi AddAdja;
tanganyika-tói AddAdja;
taslinyi AddAdja;
telekgerendási AddAdja;
teslányi AddAdja;
tiszaháti AddAdja;
tomográfiányi AddAdja;
traktoristányi AddAdja;
tudatalatti AddAdja;
tálcányi AddAdja;
télemakhoszi AddAdja;
törzsbordai AddAdja;
ultramikrokémiai AddAdja;
vacki AddAdja;
valutapiaci AddAdja;
vegyesipari AddAdja;
vidákovitsi AddAdja;
virágosládányi AddAdja;
vágányzári AddAdja;
vászonnyi AddAdja;
víziorgonányi AddAdja;
wodianeri AddAdja;
zeneakadémiai AddAdja;
zsurnalisztikai AddAdja;
zöldpaprikai AddAdja;
államnyi AddAdja;
árkategóriai AddAdja;
ékhoronnyi AddAdja;
ívlámpányi AddAdja;
önkényuralomnyi AddAdja;
újsolti AddAdja;
őlordságai AddAdja;
